Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Chapter 7. Absentee Voting.
§ 24.2-706.
Duty of general registrar on receipt of application; statement of voter.

On receipt of an application for an absentee ballot, the general registrar shall enroll the name and address of each registered applicant on an absentee voter applicant list that shall be maintained in the office of the general registrar with a file of the applications received. The list shall be available for inspection and copying and the applications shall be available for inspection only by any registered voter during regular office hours. Upon request and for a reasonable fee, the Department of Elections shall provide an electronic copy of the absentee voter applicant list to any political party or candidate. Such list shall be used only for campaign and political purposes. Any list made available for inspection and copying under this section shall contain the post office box address in lieu of the residence street address for any individual who has furnished at the time of registration or subsequently, in addition to his street address, a post office box address pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-418

.

No list or application containing an individual’s social security number, or any part thereof, or the individual’s day and month of birth, shall be made available for inspection or copying by anyone. The Department of Elections shall prescribe procedures for general registrars to make the information in the lists and applications available in a manner that does not reveal social security numbers or parts thereof, or an individual’s day and month of birth.

The completion and timely delivery of an application for an absentee ballot shall be construed to be an offer by the applicant to vote in the election.

The general registrar shall note on each application received whether the applicant is or is not a registered voter. In reviewing the application for an absentee ballot, the general registrar shall not reject the application of any individual because of an error or omission on any record or paper relating to the application, if such error or omission is not material in determining whether such individual is qualified to vote absentee.

If the application has been properly completed and signed and the applicant is a registered voter of the precinct in which he offers to vote, the general registrar shall, at the time when the printed ballots for the election are available, send by the deadline set out in §

24.2-612

, obtaining a certificate or other evidence of either first-class or expedited mailing or delivery from the United States Postal Service or other commercial delivery provider, or deliver to him in person in the office of the registrar, the following items and nothing else:

An envelope containing the folded ballot, sealed and marked “Ballot within. Do not open except in presence of a witness.”

An envelope for resealing the marked ballot, on which envelope is printed the following:

Click to view

For elections held after January 1, 2004, instead of the envelope containing the above oath, an envelope containing the standard oath prescribed by the presidential designee under § 101(b)(7) of the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.) shall be sent to voters who are qualified to vote absentee under that Act.

When this statement has been properly completed and signed by the registered voter and witnessed, his ballot shall not be subject to challenge pursuant to §

24.2-651

.

An envelope, properly addressed and postage prepaid, for the return of the ballot to the general registrar by mail or by the applicant in person, or to a drop-off location.

Printed instructions for completing the ballot and statement on the envelope and returning the ballot. Such instructions shall include information on the sites of all drop-off locations in the county or city. Whenever there is a proposed constitutional amendment or a statewide referendum to be voted on by the voters, these instructions shall also include the website address where the explanation of the proposed amendment prepared pursuant to § 30-19.9 or the information about the referendum prepared pursuant to § 30-19.10 is posted on the Department’s website.

For federal elections held after January 1, 2004, for any voter who is required by subparagraph (b) of 52 U.S.C. § 21083 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 to show identification the first time the voter votes in a federal election in the state, the printed instructions shall direct the voter to submit with his ballot (i) a copy of a current and valid photo identification or (ii) a copy of a current utility bill, bank statement, government check, paycheck or other government document that shows the name and address of the voter. Such individual who desires to vote by mail but who does not submit one of the forms of identification specified in this paragraph may cast such ballot by mail and the ballot shall be counted as a provisional ballot under the provisions of §

24.2-653.01

. The Department of Elections shall provide instructions to the electoral boards for the handling and counting of such provisional ballots pursuant to §

24.2-653.01

and this section.

For any voter entitled to vote absentee under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.), information provided by the Department of Elections specific to the voting rights and responsibilities for such citizens, or information provided by the registrar specific to the status of the voter registration and absentee ballot application of such voter, may be included.

The envelopes and instructions shall be in the form prescribed by the Department of Elections.

The general registrar may contract with a third party for the printing, assembly, and mailing of the items set forth in subsection C. The general registrar shall provide to the contractor in a timely manner the names, addresses, precincts, and ballot styles of voters requesting an absentee ballot by mail. The vendor shall provide to the general registrar a report of the voters to whom the absentee ballot materials have been sent.

If the applicant completes his application in person under §

24.2-701

at a time when the printed ballots for the election are available, he may request that the general registrar send to him by mail the items set forth in subdivisions C 1 through 4, instead of casting the ballot in person. Such request shall be made no later than 5:00 p.m. on the eleventh day prior to the election in which the applicant offers to vote, and the general registrar shall send those items to the applicant by mail, obtaining a certificate or other evidence of mailing.

If the applicant is a covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

, the general registrar, at the time when the printed ballots for the election are available, shall mail by the deadline set forth in §

24.2-612

or deliver in person to the applicant in the office of the general registrar the items as set forth in subdivisions C 1 through 4 and, if necessary, an application for registration. A certificate or other evidence of mailing shall not be required. If the applicant requests that such items be sent by electronic transmission, the general registrar, at the time when the printed ballots for the election are available but not later than the deadline set forth in §

24.2-612

, shall send by electronic transmission the blank ballot, the form for the envelope for returning the marked ballot, and instructions to the voter. Such materials shall be sent using the official email address or fax number of the office of the general registrar published on the Department of Elections website. The State Board of Elections may prescribe by regulation the format of the email address used for transmitting ballots to eligible voters. A general registrar may also use electronic transmission facilities provided by the Federal Voting Assistance Program. The voted ballot shall be returned to the general registrar as otherwise required by this chapter.

The circuit courts shall have jurisdiction to issue an injunction to enforce the provisions of this section upon the application of (i) any aggrieved voter, (ii) any candidate in an election district in whole or in part in the court’s jurisdiction where a violation of this section has occurred, or is likely to occur, or (iii) the campaign committee or the appropriate district political party chairman of such candidate. Any person who fails to discharge his duty as provided in this section through willful neglect of duty and with malicious intent shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor as provided in subsection A of §

24.2-1001

.

“Statement of Voter.” “I do hereby state, subject to felony penalties for making false statements pursuant to §

24.2-1016

, that my FULL NAME is ; that I am now or have been at some time since last November’s general election a legal resident of that I received the enclosed ballot(s) upon application to the registrar of such county or city; that I opened the envelope marked ‘ballot within’ and marked the ballot(s) in the presence of the witness, without assistance or knowledge on the part of anyone as to the manner in which I marked it (or I am returning the form required to report how I was assisted); that I then sealed the ballot(s) in this envelope; and that I have not voted and will not vote in this election at any other time or place. (last, first, middle) (STATE YOUR LEGAL RESIDENCE IN VIRGINIA including the house number, street name or rural route address, city, zip code); Signature of Voter Date Signature of witness ”

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-327, 24-332, 24-333, 24-345.6, 24-345.7; 1952, c. 509; 1956, c. 525; 1958, c. 351; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-229; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 119, 247, 265; 1972, c. 620; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1977, c. 490; 1978, c. 778; 1980, c. 639; 1981, c. 425; 1983, c. 461; 1988, cc. 624, 691; 1993, c. 641; 1994, cc. 633, 656; 1996, c. 253; 2000, c. 421; 2001, cc. 621, 866; 2002, cc. 785, 819; 2003, cc. 247, 478; 2004, c. 410; 2006, c. 438; 2007, c. 318; 2008, cc. 106, 300, 379; 2009, cc. 345, 405, 873; 2010, cc. 213, 316, 449, 538, 645, 812; 2011, cc. 427, 458; 2012, c. 393; 2015, cc. 313, 644, 645; 2016, cc. 16, 463; 2019, cc. 668, 669; 2020, cc. 289, 735, 1149, 1151, 1201; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 246, 471, 522; 2022, c. 254.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, c. 410, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act affecting uniformed and overseas voters as defined in the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act (42 U.S.C. § 1973ff [now 52 USC § 20301] et seq.) shall be applicable to any Federal Post Card Application received from such voter after November 4, 2003.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “52 U.S.C. § 20301 et seq.” was twice substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 1973ff et seq.” and “52 U.S.C. § 21083” was substituted for “42 U.S.C. § 15483” to conform to the editorial reclassification of Title 52, U.S.C., effective September 1, 2014.

Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to elections beginning with the general election on November 3, 2020.” Acts 2020, c. 1201, cl. 3 repealed the second enactment clause of Acts 2019, cc. 668 and 669.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, Item 86.10, as added by Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides:

“A. 1. For the general election and special elections to be held November 3, 2020, upon receipt of an absentee ballot returned before October 31, 2020, each general registrar shall examine the ballot envelopes to verify completion of the required voter affirmation.

“2. If the general registrar finds during the examination of a returned absentee ballot envelope that the required voter affirmation was not correctly or completely filled out or that a procedure required by §

24.2-707

of the Code of Virginia was not properly followed, and such error or failure shall render the ballot void by law, the general registrar shall, within three days of such finding, notify the voter of the error or failure. However, notwithstanding the provisions of §§

24.2-706

and

24.2-707

of the Code of Virginia, the failure of an absentee voter marking and returning a mail absentee ballot for the November 3, 2020, general election, and any special election or ballot measure held on that date, to have a witness sign the statement on the back of the absentee ballot return envelope shall not be considered a material omission and shall not render his ballot void. Such notice shall be made by phone, email, or in writing and shall provide information to the voter as to how to correct the issue so his ballot may be counted. The voter shall be entitled to make such necessary corrections before noon on the third day after the election, and his ballot shall then be counted pursuant to the procedures set forth in §

24.2-709.1

of the Code of Virginia if he is found to be entitled to vote. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no absentee ballot needing correction shall be delivered to the officers of election at the appropriate precinct until the voter is provided the opportunity to make the necessary corrections pursuant to this subparagraph.

“3. The general registrar may issue a new absentee ballot to the voter if necessary and shall preserve the first ballot with other spoiled ballots.

“B. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for the general election and special elections to be held on November 3, 2020, mailed absentee ballots shall be returned (i) by mail to the office of the general registrar, (ii) by the voter in person to the general registrar, (iii) to a drop-off location, or (iv) by commercial delivery service.

“2. Mailed absentee ballots shall provide instructions that include information on the locations of all drop-off locations available in the locality at the time such ballots are mailed by the general registrar.

“3. The general registrar of each county or city shall establish at the office of the general registrar and each voter satellite office in operation for an election a drop-off location for the purpose of allowing voters to deposit completed absentee ballots for such election. On the day of the election, there shall also be a drop-off location at each polling place in operation for the election. The general registrar may establish additional drop-off locations within the county or city as he deems necessary. All drop-off locations shall be accessible; be on public property, unless located at a polling place; and otherwise comply with any criteria for drop-off locations set by the Department of Elections.

“4. The Department of Elections shall set standards for the establishment and operation of drop-off locations, including necessary security requirements. The Department of Elections shall submit such standards to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Privileges and Elections, the Senate Committee on Finance and Appropriations, and the House Committee on Appropriations within 30 days of the effective date of this act [September 4, 2020].

“5. The general registrar of a county or city utilizing drop-off locations shall post notice of the locations of the drop-off locations in the locality in the office of the general registrar and on the official website for the county or city. Such notice shall remain in the office of the general registrar and on the official website for the county or city for the duration of the period during which absentee ballots may be returned.

“6. Absentee ballots shall be collected from drop-off locations in accordance with the instructions provided by the Department of Elections. Such instructions shall include chain of custody requirements and recordkeeping requirements. Absentee ballots shall be collected at least daily, by two officers of election representing the two major political parties, when practicable, or by two employees from the office of the general registrar, unless the drop-off location is in the office of the general registrar, in which case the general registrar or an assistant general registrar may collect the absentee ballots.

“7. Any ballot returned to a drop-off location in any manner except as prescribed by law shall be void. Absentee ballots shall be returned to a drop-off location before the closing of the polls. Any voter who is in line to return the voter’s absentee ballot at a drop-off location by 7:00 p.m. on the day of the election shall be permitted to deposit the absentee ballot.

“C. 1. The general registrar shall include with the absentee ballot prescribed in §

24.2-706

of the Code of Virginia, an envelope, properly addressed and postage prepaid, for the return of the ballot to the general registrar by mail for the general election and special elections held on November 3, 2020.

“2. Included in this appropriation is up to $2,000,000 the first year from the general fund to reimburse localities for the cost of prepaid postage required in subparagraph C.1. of this Item. This amount shall remain unallotted until the Department of Elections provides documentation of qualifying amounts to be reimbursed to localities for prepaid postage of return absentee ballots and shall not be used or otherwise obligated for any other purposes.”

Acts 2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 1, cl. 2 provides: “That this act is effective on its passage [September 4, 2020] as provided in §

1-214

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 246, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Board of Elections shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 60 days of its enactment. Such regulations shall include processes that ensure secure and timely delivery of voter information to contractors and reports of mailed absentee ballots from contractors.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 421 substituted “a legal” for “an actual” in the paragraph following the heading “Statement of Voter.”

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 621 substituted “applicant list that” for “applicant list which” in the first paragraph, and substituted “and signed” for “signed, and witnessed” in the fourth paragraph.

The 2001 amendment by c. 866 added the second sentence of the fourth paragraph.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 785 and 819 are identical, and substituted “last November’s” for “the last November” in the “Statement of Voter”; deleted “above” following “subdivisions 1 through 4” in the eleventh paragraph; in the next to last paragraph, deleted “above” following “subdivisions 1 through 4,” and deleted “pursuant to §

24.2-419

” following “registration”; and deleted “above” following “subdivision 2” in the last paragraph.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 247 in subdivision 2, substituted “FULL NAME” for “full name” and inserted “STATE YOUR LEGAL RESIDENCE IN VIRGINIA including the” in the form.

The 2003 amendment by c. 478 added the last sentence to the seventh paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 410, effective April 12, 2004, added the last paragraph in subdivisions 2 and 4; and added subdivision 5.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 438 substituted “no later than 5:00 p.m. on the seventh day” for “at least five days” in the last sentence of the third from last paragraph.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 318 inserted “or any part thereof” in the first sentence of the second paragraph and “or any parts thereof” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 106 and 300 are identical, and added the third and fourth sentences of the next-to-last paragraph.

The 2008 amendment by c. 379, in the second paragraph, inserted “or the individual’s day and month of birth” in the first sentence and “or an individual’s day and month of birth” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 345 substituted “located outside of the Commonwealth” for “residing or is stationed outside the continental borders of the United States” in the fourth paragraph of subdivision 5.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 405 and 873 are identical, and substituted “within three business days of receiving an application for an absentee ballot, or as soon thereafter as is reasonably possible” for “immediately” in the fifth paragraph and added the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 213 added the third sentence of the first paragraph.

The 2010 amendment by c. 316, in the second sentence of the first paragraph, deleted “and the applications” following “the list” and inserted “and the applications shall be available for inspection only.”

The 2010 amendments by cc. 449 and 645 are identical, and in the third paragraph following subdivision 5, inserted “at the time when the printed ballots for the election are available” twice and “within three business days” twice, and deleted “and if the applicant voter is located outside of the Commonwealth” following “if the voter so requests.”

The 2010 amendment by c. 538 substituted “at the time when the printed ballots for the election are available, send within three business days of receiving a properly completed application for an absentee ballot” for “within three business days of receiving an application for an absentee ballot, or as soon thereafter as is reasonably possible, send” in the fifth paragraph; and inserted the last sentence in the last paragraph.

The 2010 amendment by c. 812 added the last three sentences of the first paragraph and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 427 and 458 are identical, and in the fifth paragraph, substituted “send by the deadline set out in §

24.2-612

” for “send within three business days of receiving a properly completed application for an absentee ballot to the applicant by mail”; in the last paragraph in subdivision 4, made minor stylistic changes and inserted the last occurrence of “government” in the first sentence; and in the second-to-last paragraph, twice substituted “by the deadline set forth in §

24.2-612

” for “within three business days.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 393 inserted “of either first-class or expedited mailing or delivery from the United States Postal Service or other commercial delivery provider” near the middle of the fifth paragraph.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 313 substituted “Department” for “State Board” in the first and second paragraphs and in the first paragraph following subdivision 4; inserted “or other evidence” following “certificate” in the fifth paragraph and in the second sentence of the third paragraph following subdivision 5; and substituted “Department of Elections” for “State Board” in subdivision 5 and in the first paragraph following subdivision 5.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 644 and 645 are identical, and substituted “general registrar” for “electoral board” throughout the section; deleted “local electoral boards and” preceding “general” in the second sentence of the second paragraph; in the fourth paragraph, deleted “and notify the secretary of the electoral board” following “voter” in the first sentence and “and electoral board” following “registrar” in the second sentence; in the fifth paragraph, deleted “secretary or” preceding “registrar” in the first sentence; in the third paragraph of subdivision 5, deleted “or the secretary of the electoral board” following “registrar” throughout the first sentence and deleted “or the secretary” preceding “may” in the second sentence; and deleted “secretary or” following “office of the” in the first sentence of the fourth paragraph of subdivision 5.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 16 and 463 are identical, and in the fourth paragraph in subdivision 5, rewrote the third sentence, which read “The general registrar, at the time when the printed ballots for the election are available, shall send by the deadline set forth in §

24.2-612

the blank ballot, the form for the envelope for returning the marked ballot, and instructions to the voter by electronic transmission if the voter so requests” and added the fourth through sixth sentences.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 668 and 669 are identical, and added the subsection A through E designations; in subsection A, substituted “received” for “of the listed applicants”; in subdivision B 2, added the last paragraph; rewrote subsection C, which read: “If the applicant makes his application to vote in person under §

24.2-701

at a time when the printed ballots for the election are available, the general registrar, on the determination of the qualifications of the applicant to vote, shall provide to the applicant the items set forth in subdivisions 1 through 4, and no item shall be removed by the applicant from the office of the general registrar. On the request of the applicant, made no later than 5:00 p.m. on the seventh day prior to the election in which the applicant offers to vote, the general registrar may send the items set forth in subdivisions 1 through 4 to the applicant by mail, obtaining a certificate or other evidence of mailing”; and deleted the second paragraph of subsection D, which read: “When the statement prescribed in subdivision 2 has been properly completed and signed by the registered voter and witnessed, his ballot shall not be subject to challenge pursuant to §

24.2-651

.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 289, substituted “eleventh day” for “seventh day” in subsection C.

The 2020 amendment by c. 735, substituted “24.2-653.01” for “24.2-653” and “§

24.2-653.01

” for “subsection B of §

24.2-653

” in the second paragraph of subdivision B 4.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1149, 1151, and 1201 are identical, and substituted “is a covered voter, as defined in §

24.2-452

” for “states as the reason for his absence on election day any of the reasons set forth in subdivision A 2 of §

24.2-700

” in the first sentence of subsection D.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 246, effective July 1, 2021, inserted the subsection C identifier, added subsection D, and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 471, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “with printing only on the flap side” following “envelope” in subdivision C 2; in subdivision C 3, substituted “An envelope, properly addressed and postage prepaid” for “A properly addressed envelope” and added “or to a drop-of location”; and added the second sentence in subdivision C 4.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 522, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision C 3, inserted “or to a drop-of location”; and added the second sentence in subdivision C 4.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 254 added the third sentence in the first paragraph in subdivision C 4.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Absentee ballots. —

The provisions of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, specifically 42 U.S.C.A. § 1971(a)(2)(B), does not conflict with the specific requirement of completion of the voter statement required by §

24.2-706

and would not preempt the Commonwealth from requiring such a statement. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jean R. Jensen, Secretary, State Board of Elections, 05-050 (8/1/05).

The State Board of Elections has the authority to adopt standards and instructions for use by local election officials in determining what constitutes an error or omission in completion of the voter statement that is not material in determining whether an individual is qualified to vote in an election. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Jean R. Jensen, Secretary, State Board of Elections, 05-050 (8/1/05).